Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,227
Submission of question; limitation.

The question of imposing a license or occupation tax under section 77-27,223 which has been submitted to the registered voters and failed shall not be submitted to the registered voters of the county again until twenty-three months after such failure.

Laws 2002, LB 259, § 5.